Utah statutes.
19-9-118.   Legal, accounting, and auditing services for authority.

(1)  The attorney general shall provide all legal services, and the state auditor, all accounting and auditing services, for the authority without reimbursement.

(2)  Subsection (1) is inapplicable to the opinions of attorneys or accountants necessitated before issuance of any obligations.

